Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201268-1204
Social services
or specialized developmental disability services; rules and regulations; agreements;
fee schedules.

(1) For the purpose of providing
or purchasing social services described in section 68-1202, the state hereby
accepts and assents to all applicable provisions of the federal Social Security
Act, as amended. The
Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations, enter into agreements, and adopt fee schedules with regard to
social services described in section 68-1202.

(2) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to administer funds under Title XX of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, designated for specialized
developmental disability services.

Laws 1973, LB 511, § 4;

Laws 1991, LB 830, § 31;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 345;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 66;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 277;

Laws 2011, LB177, § 11.